Oklahoma, session 2026, SB692.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1272, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1272.


UNLAWFUL CARRY


A. Notwithstanding any other provision of law, it shall be


unlawful for any person to carry upon or about his or her person, or


in a purse or other container belonging to the person, any pistol,


revolver, shotgun, or rifle, whether loaded or unloaded, or any


blackjack, loaded cane, hand chain, metal knuckles, or any other


offensive weapon, whether such weapon be concealed or unconcealed,


except this section shall not prohibit:



Req. No. 1113 Page 1


1. The proper use of guns and knives for self-defense, hunting,


fishing, educational, or recreational purposes;


2. The carrying or use of weapons in a manner otherwise


permitted by statute or authorized by the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act;


3. The carrying, possession, and use of any weapon by a peace


officer or other person authorized by law to carry a weapon in the


performance of official duties and in compliance with the rules of


the employing agency;


4. The carrying or use of weapons in a courthouse by a district


judge, associate district judge, or special district judge within


this state, who is in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act and


whose name appears on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts;


5. The carrying and use of firearms and other weapons provided


in this subsection when used for the purpose of living history


reenactment. For purposes of this paragraph, “living history


reenactment” means depiction of historical characters, scenes,


historical life, or events for entertainment, education, or


historical documentation through the wearing or use of period,


historical, antique, or vintage clothing, accessories, firearms,


weapons, and other implements of the historical period; or


6. The transporting by vehicle on a public roadway or the


carrying of a firearm, concealed or unconcealed, loaded or unloaded,

Req. No. 1113 Page 2


by a person who is twenty-one (21) years of age or older or by a


person who is eighteen (18) years of age but not yet twenty-one (21)


years of age and the person is a member or veteran of the United


States Armed Forces, Reserves, or National Guard or was discharged


under honorable conditions from the United States Armed Forces,


Reserves, or National Guard, and the person is otherwise not


disqualified from the possession or purchase of a firearm under


state or federal law and is not carrying the firearm in furtherance


of a crime.


Except as provided in subsection B of Section 1283 of this


title, a person who has been convicted of any one of the following


offenses in this state or a violation of the equivalent law of


another state:


a. assault and battery pursuant to the provisions of


Section 644 of this title which caused serious


physical injury to the victim,


b. aggravated assault and battery pursuant to the


provisions of Section 646 of this title,


c. assault and battery that qualifies as domestic abuse


as defined in Section 644 of this title,


d. stalking pursuant to the provisions of Section 1173 of


this title,





Req. No. 1113 Page 3


e. a violation of an order issued under the Protection


from Domestic Abuse Act or a domestic abuse protection


order issued by another state, or


f. a violation relating to illegal drug use or possession


under the provisions of the Uniform Controlled


Dangerous Substances Act,


shall be prohibited from carrying a firearm under the provisions of


this paragraph. Any person who carries a firearm in the manner


provided for in this paragraph shall be prohibited from carrying the


firearm into any of the places prohibited in subsection A of Section


1277 of this title or any other place currently prohibited by law.


Nothing in this section shall modify or otherwise change where a


person may legally carry a firearm.


B. Any person convicted of violating the foregoing provision


shall be guilty of a misdemeanor punishable as provided in Section


1276 of this title.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1277, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1277.


UNLAWFUL CARRY IN CERTAIN PLACES


A. It shall be unlawful for any person, including a person in


possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry any concealed


or unconcealed firearm into any of the following places:

Req. No. 1113 Page 4


1. Any structure, building, or office space which is owned or


leased by a city, town, county, state, or federal governmental


authority for the purpose of conducting business with the public;


2. Any courthouse, courtroom, prison, jail, detention facility,


or any facility used to process, hold, or house arrested persons,


prisoners, or persons alleged delinquent or adjudicated delinquent,


except as provided in Section 21 of Title 57 of the Oklahoma


Statutes;


3. Any public or private elementary or public or private


secondary school, except as provided in subsections C and D of this


section;


4. Any publicly owned or operated sports arena or venue during


a professional sporting event, unless allowed by the event holder;


5. Any place where gambling is authorized by law, unless


allowed by the property owner;


6. Any other place specifically prohibited by law; and


7. Any property set aside by a county, city, town, public trust


with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or state governmental


authority for an event that is secured with minimum-security minimum


security provisions. For purposes of this paragraph, a minimum-


security minimum security provision consists of a location that is


secured utilizing the following:


a. a metallic-style security fence that is at least eight


(8) feet in height that encompasses the property and

Req. No. 1113 Page 5


is secured in such a way as to deter unauthorized


entry,


b. controlled access points staffed by a uniformed,


commissioned peace officer, and


c. a metal detector whereby persons walk or otherwise


travel with their property through or by the metal


detector.


B. It shall be lawful for a person to carry a concealed or


unconcealed firearm on the following properties:


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, by a city, town, county,


state, or federal governmental authority;


2. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, which is open to the


public, or by any entity engaged in gambling authorized by law;


3. Any property adjacent to a structure, building, or office


space in which concealed or unconcealed weapons are prohibited by


the provisions of this section;


4. Any property designated by a city, town, county, or state


governmental authority as a park, recreational area, wildlife


refuge, wildlife management area, or fairgrounds; provided, nothing


in this paragraph shall be construed to authorize any entry by a


person in possession of a concealed or unconcealed firearm into any



Req. No. 1113 Page 6


structure, building, office space or event which is specifically


prohibited by the provisions of subsection A of this section;


5. Any property set aside by a public or private elementary or


secondary school for the use or parking of any vehicle, whether


attended or unattended; provided, however, the firearm shall be


stored and hidden from view in a locked motor vehicle when the motor


vehicle is left unattended on school property; and


6. Any public property set aside temporarily by a county, city,


town, public trust with a county, city, or town as a beneficiary, or


state governmental authority for the holder of an event permit that


is without minimum-security minimum security provisions, as such


term is defined in paragraph 7 of subsection A of this section;


provided, the carry of firearms within said the permitted event area


shall be limited to concealed carry of a handgun unless otherwise


authorized by the holder of the event permit.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection or


subsection C of this section shall be construed to authorize or


allow any person in control of any place described in subsection A


of this section to establish any policy or rule that has the effect


of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a handgun license


or otherwise in lawful possession of a firearm from carrying or


possessing the firearm on the property described in this subsection.


C. A concealed or unconcealed weapon may be carried onto


private school property or in any school bus or vehicle used by any

Req. No. 1113 Page 7


private school for transportation of students or teachers by a


person who is licensed pursuant to the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act,


provided a policy has been adopted by the governing entity of the


private school that authorizes the carrying and possession of a


weapon on private school property or in any school bus or vehicle


used by a private school. Except for acts of gross negligence or


willful or wanton misconduct, a governing entity of a private school


that adopts a policy which authorizes the possession of a weapon on


private school property, a school bus, or a vehicle used by the


private school shall not be subject to liability for any injuries


arising from the adoption of the policy. The provisions of this


subsection shall not apply to claims pursuant to the Administrative


Workers’ Compensation Act.


D. Notwithstanding paragraph 3 of subsection A of this section,


a A board of education of a school district may adopt a policy


pursuant to Section 5-149.2 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes to


authorize the carrying of a handgun onto school property by school


personnel specifically designated by the board of education,


provided such personnel either:


1. Possess a valid armed security guard license as provided for


in Section 1750.1 et seq. of Title 59 of the Oklahoma Statutes the


Oklahoma Security Guard and Private Investigator Act; or


2. Hold a valid reserve peace officer certification as provided


for in Section 3311 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes.

Req. No. 1113 Page 8


Nothing in this subsection shall be construed to restrict authority


granted elsewhere in law to carry firearms.


E. Notwithstanding the provisions of subsection A of this


section, on any property designated as a municipal zoo or park of


any size that is owned, leased, operated, or managed by:


1. A public trust created pursuant to the provisions of Section


176 of Title 60 of the Oklahoma Statutes; or


2. A nonprofit entity,


an individual shall be allowed to carry a concealed handgun but not


openly carry a handgun on the property.


F. Any person violating the provisions of paragraph 2 or 3 of


subsection A of this section shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a


misdemeanor punishable by a fine not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00). A person violating any other provision of


subsection A of this section may be denied entrance onto the


property or removed from the property. If the person refuses to


leave the property and a peace officer is summoned, the person may


be issued a citation for an amount not to exceed Two Hundred Fifty


Dollars ($250.00).


G. No person in possession of a valid handgun license issued


pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act or who


is carrying or in possession of a firearm as otherwise permitted by


law or who is carrying or in possession of a machete, blackjack,


loaded cane, or hand chain or metal knuckles shall be authorized to

Req. No. 1113 Page 9


carry the firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, or hand chain or


metal knuckles into or upon any college, university, or technology


center school property, except as provided in this subsection. For


purposes of this subsection, the following property shall not be


construed to be college, university, or technology center school


property:


1. Any property set aside for the use or parking of any motor


vehicle, whether attended or unattended, provided the firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, or hand chain or metal knuckles are


carried or stored as required by law and the firearm, machete,


blackjack, loaded cane, or hand chain or metal knuckles are not


removed from the motor vehicle without the prior consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator while the vehicle is on any college, university, or


technology center school property;


2. Any property authorized for possession or use of firearms,


machetes, blackjacks, loaded canes, or hand chains or metal knuckles


by college, university, or technology center school policy; and


3. Any property authorized by the written consent of the


college or university president or technology center school


administrator, provided the written consent is carried with the


firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, or hand chain or metal


knuckles and the valid handgun license while on college, university,


or technology center school property.

Req. No. 1113 Page 10


The college, university, or technology center school may notify


the Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation within ten (10) days of a


violation of any provision of this subsection by a licensee. Upon


receipt of a written notification of violation, the Bureau shall


give a reasonable notice to the licensee and hold a hearing. At the


hearing, upon a determination that the licensee has violated any


provision of this subsection, the licensee may be subject to an


administrative fine of Two Hundred Fifty Dollars ($250.00) and may


have the handgun license suspended for three (3) months.


Nothing contained in any provision of this subsection shall be


construed to authorize or allow any college, university, or


technology center school to establish any policy or rule that has


the effect of prohibiting any person in lawful possession of a


handgun license or any person in lawful possession of a firearm,


machete, blackjack, loaded cane, or hand chain or metal knuckles


from possession of a firearm, machete, blackjack, loaded cane, or


hand chain or metal knuckles in places described in paragraphs 1, 2,


and 3 of this subsection. Nothing contained in any provision of


this subsection shall be construed to limit the authority of any


college, university, or technology center school in this state from


taking administrative action against any student for any violation


of any provision of this subsection.


H. The provisions of this section shall not apply to the


following:

Req. No. 1113 Page 11


1. Any peace officer or any person authorized by law to carry a


firearm in the course of employment;


2. District judges, associate district judges, and special


district judges, who are in possession of a valid handgun license


issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act


and whose names appear on a list maintained by the Administrative


Director of the Courts, when acting in the course and scope of


employment within the courthouses of this state;


3. Private investigators with a firearms authorization when


acting in the course and scope of employment;


4. Elected officials An elected official of a county, who are


is in possession of a valid handgun license issued pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, may carry a concealed


handgun when acting in the performance of his or her duties within


the courthouses of the county in which he or she was elected. The


provisions of this paragraph shall not allow the elected county


official to carry the handgun into a courtroom;


5. The sheriff of any county may authorize certain employees of


the county, who possess a valid handgun license issued pursuant to


the provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act, to carry a


concealed handgun when acting in the course and scope of employment


within the courthouse in the county in which the person is employed.


Nothing in the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall prohibit the sheriff


from requiring additional instruction or training before granting

Req. No. 1113 Page 12


authorization to carry a concealed handgun within the courthouse.


The provisions of this paragraph and of paragraph 6 of this


subsection shall not allow the county employee to carry the handgun


into a courtroom, sheriff’s office, adult or juvenile jail, or any


other prisoner detention area; and


6. The board of county commissioners of any county may


authorize certain employees of the county, who possess a valid


handgun license issued pursuant to the provisions of the Oklahoma


Self-Defense Act, to carry a concealed handgun when acting in the


course and scope of employment on county annex facilities or grounds


surrounding the county courthouse.


I. For the purposes of this section, “motor vehicle” means any


automobile, truck, minivan, sports utility vehicle, or motorcycle,


as defined in Section 1-135 of Title 47 of the Oklahoma Statutes,


equipped with a locked accessory container within or affixed to the


motorcycle.


SECTION 3. AMENDATORY 21 O.S. 2021, Section 1287, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 1287.


USE OF FIREARM WHILE COMMITTING A FELONY


A. Any person who, while committing or attempting to commit a


felony, possesses a pistol, shotgun, or rifle or any other offensive


weapon in such commission or attempt, whether the pistol, shotgun,


or rifle is loaded or not, or who possesses a blank or imitation

Req. No. 1113 Page 13


pistol, altered air or toy pistol, shotgun, or rifle capable of


raising in the mind of one threatened with such device a fear that


it is a real pistol, shotgun, or rifle, or who possesses an air gun


or carbon dioxide or other gas-filled weapon, electronic dart gun,


conductive energy weapon, knife, dagger, dirk, switchblade knife,


blackjack, ax, loaded cane, billy, or hand chain or metal knuckles,


in addition to the penalty provided by statute for the felony


committed or attempted shall, upon conviction, be guilty of a felony


for possessing such weapon or device, which shall be a separate


offense from the felony committed or attempted and shall be


punishable by imprisonment in the custody of the Department of


Corrections for a period of not less than two (2) years nor for more


than ten (10) years for the first offense, and for a period of not


less than ten (10) years nor more than thirty (30) years for any


second or subsequent offense.


B. Any person convicted of violating the provisions of this


section after having been issued a handgun license pursuant to the


provisions of the Oklahoma Self-Defense Act shall have the license


revoked and shall be liable for an administrative fine of One


Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) upon a hearing and determination by the


Oklahoma State Bureau of Investigation that the person is in


violation of the provisions of this section.


C. As used in this section:



Req. No. 1113 Page 14


1. “Altered toy pistol” shall mean any toy weapon which has


been altered from its original manufactured state to resemble a real


weapon; and


2. “Altered air pistol” shall mean any air pistol manufactured


to propel projectiles by air pressure which has been altered from


its original manufactured state.


SECTION 4. This act shall become effective November 1, 2025.




60-1-1113 CN 1/19/2025 5:41:29 AM































Req. No. 1113 Page 15